District of Columbia statutes.
21-1710

Law not retroactive.

This chapter does not apply to transactions that took place prior to May 14, 1928.

History

Sept. 14, 1965, 79 Stat. 778, Pub. L. 89-183, § 1

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 21-1710.
1973 Ed., § 21-1710.

Editor's Notes

Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 11 of the Uniform Fiduciaries Act.